Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202018-3302
City or village in two or more counties; annexation; petition of owners; procedure.

Whenever the owner, owners, or a majority of the owners of any territory lying contiguous to the corporate limits of any city or village, the corporate limits of which city or village is situated in two or more counties and, whether the territory shall be situated within or without the counties of which such city or village is a part, except as provided in section 13-1115, shall desire to annex such territory to such city or village, such territory may be annexed in the manner provided in section 18-3301 and when so annexed shall thereafter be a part of such city or village.

Laws 1903, c. 23, § 1, p. 259;

R.S.1913, § 5087;

C.S.1922, § 4259;

C.S.1929, § 17-408;

R.S.1943, § 17-406;

Laws 1957, c. 51, § 12, p. 245;

R.S.1943, (2012), § 17-406;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 313.